Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.05
Sickness and accident insurance; standard policy form; inapplicable; omission or modification.

If any provision of sections 44-710.03 and 44-710.04 is in whole or in part inapplicable to or inconsistent with the coverage provided by a particular form of policy of sickness and accident insurance, the insurer, with the approval of the Director of Insurance, shall omit from such policy any inapplicable provision or part of a provision and shall modify any inconsistent provision or part of the provision in such manner as to make the provision as contained in the policy consistent with the coverage provided by the policy.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 6, p. 655;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 135.